Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3003
Financial literacy instruction; required; high school course; requirements.

Beginning with school year 2023-24, each school district, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall include financial literacy instruction, as appropriate, in the instructional program of its elementary and middle schools and require each student attending a public school to complete at least one five-credit high school course in personal finance or financial literacy prior to graduation.

Laws 2021, LB452, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB1112, § 8.
July 21, 2022